New York, session 2025-2026, A10421.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Shepherd 2 Patterson notification act of 2026". 3 § 2. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 2500-n 4 to read as follows: 5 § 2500-n. Information on education accommodations for a minor patient 6 with a medical condition that may cause a disability. 1. On or before 7 July first, two thousand twenty-six, the department, in consultation 8 with the department of education, shall develop an informational elec- 9 tronic notice and resource for practitioners to provide to the parents 10 or guardians of a patient under the age of eighteen with a medical 11 condition that may create a disability for the patient as defined under 12 section five hundred four of the federal rehabilitation act of nineteen 13 hundred seventy-three. Such electronic notice shall indicate that such 14 minor may be entitled to a free and appropriate public education as 15 defined under section five hundred four of the federal rehabilitation 16 act of nineteen hundred seventy-three, as amended, which may include 17 accommodations for the delivery of programs and services for eligible 18 students with disabilities. Such written information shall also state 19 that the parent, guardian, or person in a parental relationship with the 20 patient should contact their school to discuss possible accommodations 21 for the patient and the benefits of sharing potentially life-saving 22 emergency medical information with school personnel. 23 2. The department shall ensure that such electronic notice is made 24 available through a secure electronic portal and is provided to the 25 parent or guardian at the time of patient consent for treatment or diag- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09303-05-6 A. 10421--A 2 1 nosis. Proof of access or acknowledgment through the portal shall satis- 2 fy the requirements of this section. 3 3. A practitioner shall provide the parent and/or guardian of the 4 patient with the informational electronic notice and resource developed 5 pursuant to this section. 6 4. The electronic portal may include links to relevant state and 7 federal resources, including but not limited to special education 8 services, early intervention programs, procedural safeguards, and parent 9 advocacy supports. 10 5. The department shall ensure that the electronic notice is accessi- 11 ble, including the provision of language access services and accommo- 12 dations for individuals with disabilities, consistent with state and 13 federal accessibility standards. 14 6. For purposes of this section, "practitioner" means a health care 15 professional licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized to practice 16 under the education law, acting within the scope of practice. 17 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 18 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 19 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 20 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 21 completed on or before such effective date.